Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-241.06
Bingo occasion; alcoholic beverages prohibited; exception; food; beverages; sale; expenses.

No alcoholic beverages shall be sold or served to the public during a bingo occasion unless it is a limited period bingo or special event bingo at which no one under eighteen years of age is permitted to play bingo. Nonalcoholic beverages, as well as food, may be served and sold during any bingo occasion conducted by a licensed organization if all of the profits from the sales are paid to such licensed organization. The proceeds from the sale of such food and beverage items shall not be commingled with the organization's bingo receipts or placed in the bingo checking account. No expense associated with the purchase, preparation, serving, or selling of such food and beverage items shall be paid using bingo receipts.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 43.